Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF668.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Drugs. (a) Medical assistance covers drugs, except for fertility drugs when specifically used to enhance fertility, if prescribed by a licensed practitioner and dispensed by a licensed pharmacist, by a physician enrolled in the medical assistance program as a dispensing physician, or by a physician, a physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse employed by or under contract with a community health board as defined in section 145A.02, subdivision 5, for the purposes of communicable disease control. (b) The dispensed quantity of a prescription drug must not exceed a 34-day supply unless authorized by the commissioner or as provided in paragraph (h) or the drug appears on the 90-day supply list published by the commissioner. The 90-day supply list shall be published by the commissioner on the department's website. The commissioner may add to, delete from, and otherwise modify the 90-day supply list after providing public notice and the opportunity for a 15-day public comment period. The 90-day supply list may include cost-effective generic drugs and shall not include controlled substances. (c) For the purpose of this subdivision and subdivision 13d, an "active pharmaceutical ingredient" is defined as a substance that is represented for use in a drug and when used in the manufacturing, processing, or packaging of a drug becomes an active ingredient of the drug product. An "excipient" is defined as an inert substance used as a diluent or vehicle for a drug. The commissioner shall establish a list of active pharmaceutical ingredients and excipients which are included in the medical assistance formulary. Medical assistance covers selected active pharmaceutical ingredients and excipients used in compounded prescriptions when the compounded combination is specifically approved by the commissioner or when a commercially available product: (1) is not a therapeutic option for the patient; (2) does not exist in the same combination of active ingredients in the same strengths as the compounded prescription; and (3) cannot be used in place of the active pharmaceutical ingredient in the compounded prescription. (d) Medical assistance covers the following over-the-counter drugs when prescribed by a licensed practitioner or by a licensed pharmacist who meets standards established by the commissioner, in consultation with the board of pharmacy: antacids, acetaminophen, family planning products, aspirin, insulin, products for the treatment of lice, vitamins for adults with documented vitamin deficiencies, vitamins for children under the age of seven and pregnant or nursing women, and any other over-the-counter drug identified by the commissioner, in consultation with the Formulary Committee, as necessary, appropriate, and cost-effective for the treatment of certain specified chronic diseases, conditions, or disorders, and this determination shall not be subject to the requirements of chapter 14. A pharmacist may prescribe over-the-counter medications as provided under this paragraph for purposes of receiving reimbursement under Medicaid. When prescribing over-the-counter drugs under this paragraph, licensed pharmacists must consult with the recipient to determine necessity, provide drug counseling, review drug therapy for potential adverse interactions, and make referrals as needed to other health care professionals. (e) Effective January 1, 2006, medical assistance shall not cover drugs that are coverable under Medicare Part D as defined in the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003, Public Law 108-173, section 1860D-2(e), for individuals eligible for drug coverage as defined in the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003, Public Law 108-173, section 1860D-1(a)(3)(A). For these individuals, medical assistance may cover drugs from the drug classes listed in United States Code, title 42, section 1396r-8(d)(2), subject to this subdivision and subdivisions 13a to 13g, except that drugs listed in United States Code, title 42, section 1396r-8(d)(2)(E), shall not be covered. (f) Medical assistance covers drugs acquired through the federal 340B Drug Pricing Program and dispensed by 340B covered entities and ambulatory pharmacies under common ownership of the 340B covered entity. Medical assistance does not cover drugs acquired through the federal 340B Drug Pricing Program and dispensed by 340B contract pharmacies. (g) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), medical assistance covers self-administered hormonal contraceptives prescribed and dispensed by a licensed pharmacist in accordance with section 151.37, subdivision 14; nicotine replacement medications prescribed and dispensed by a licensed pharmacist in accordance with section 151.37, subdivision 15; and opiate antagonists used for the treatment of an acute opiate overdose prescribed and dispensed by a licensed pharmacist in accordance with section 151.37, subdivision 16. (h) Medical assistance coverage for a prescription contraceptive must provide a 12-month supply for any prescription contraceptive if a 12-month supply is prescribed by the prescribing health care provider. The prescribing health care provider must determine the appropriate duration for which to prescribe the prescription contraceptives, up to 12 months. For purposes of this paragraph, "prescription contraceptive" means any drug or device that requires a prescription and is approved by the Food and Drug Administration to prevent pregnancy. Prescription contraceptive does not include an emergency contraceptive drug approved to prevent pregnancy when administered after sexual contact. For purposes of this paragraph, "health plan" has the meaning provided in section 62Q.01, subdivision 3. new text begin (i) Notwithstanding subdivisions 13d and 13g, medical assistance covers any drug on the formulary of the recipient's primary third-party payer for which the primary third-party payer has made partial payment, regardless of the drug's exclusion from the medical assistance formulary or preferred drug list. Notwithstanding subdivision 13f, medical assistance must cover drugs under this paragraph without requiring prior authorization. Medical assistance must cover drugs under this paragraph regardless of the payment amount initially covered by the primary third-party payer. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 25b, is amended to read: Subd. 25b. Authorization with third-party liability. (a) Except as otherwise allowed under this subdivision or required under federal or state regulations, the commissioner must not consider a request for authorization of a service when the recipient has coverage from a third-party payer unless the provider requesting authorization has made a good faith effort to receive payment or authorization from the third-party payer. A good faith effort is established by supplying with the authorization request to the commissioner the following: (1) a determination of payment for the service from the third-party payer, a determination of authorization for the service from the third-party payer, or a verification of noncoverage of the service by the third-party payer; and (2) the information or records required by the department to document the reason for the determination or to validate noncoverage from the third-party payer. (b) A provider requesting authorization for services covered by Medicare is not required to bill Medicare before requesting authorization from the commissioner if the provider has reason to believe that a service covered by Medicare is not eligible for payment. The provider must document that, because of recent claim experiences with Medicare or because of written communication from Medicare, coverage is not available for the service. (c) Authorization is not required if a third-party payer has made payment that is equal to or greater than 60 percent of the maximum payment amount for the service allowed under medical assistancenew text begin , except that authorization of drugs covered by a primary third-party payer is not required regardless of payment amount pursuant to subdivision 13, paragraph (i)new text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.37, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Private benefits to be used first. new text begin (a) new text end Private accident and health care coverage including Medicare for medical services is primary coverage and must be exhausted before medical assistance or alternative care services are paid for medical services including home health care, personal care assistance services, hospice, supplies and equipment, or services covered under a Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services waiver. When a person who is otherwise eligible for medical assistance has private accident or health care coverage, including Medicare or a prepaid health plan, the private health care benefits available to the person must be used first and to the fullest extent. new text begin (b) Medical assistance must cover medical services a primary third-party payer deems out-of-network or as requiring referral if the medical services are in-network and do not require a referral under medical assistance. new text end